Illinois, session 104th, HB1618.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 5Section 12-614 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/12-614 new)7    Sec. 12-614. Relay box. 8    (a) In this Section, "relay box" means a device designed 9to capture a signal from the key fob of a motor vehicle to 10unlock and start the motor vehicle without the use or 11possession of the motor vehicle key.12    (b) No person may possess a relay box in this State except 13for the following persons:14        (1) a mechanic;15        (2) a new vehicle dealer or used vehicle dealer 16    licensed under Section 5-101 or 5-102;17        (3) a locksmith licensed under the Private Detective, 18    Private Alarm, Private Security, Fingerprint Vendor, and 19    Locksmith Act of 2004;20        (4) a repossession agent; or21        (5) a State or local law enforcement officer. 22    (c) A person who commits a violation of this Section is 23guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.    HB1618- 2 -LRB104 08088 LNS 18134 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.